Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-119
Militia; rules and regulations.

The Governor, as commander in chief, is hereby authorized and empowered to make such rules and regulations and to promulgate all orders which he in his sole discretion shall determine desirable or necessary for the carrying into effect of the provisions of this code. When so promulgated by the Governor they shall have the same force and effect as the provisions of this code. The rules and regulations in force at the time of the passage of this code, and not inconsistent herewith, shall remain in force until new rules and regulations are approved and promulgated.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 54, p. 672;

C.S.1929, § 55-173;

R.S.1943, § 55-138;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 16, p. 598;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-138;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 17, p. 1586.

"This code", see section 55-101.